South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S289.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) In addition to the days provided for in Section 59-1-425 of the S.C. Code, the State Board of Education a local school district board of trustees may for the 2024-2025 school year waive the requirement that public schools make up full days missed due to inclement weather for up to an additional seven days provided that the full days of missed school were associated with Hurricane Helene. (B) If a district waives a make-up day pursuant to this section, then the make-up day is also waived for charter schools and home schooling programs in the district. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----